District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.12

Limitation of liability.

There shall not be any liability, in a private capacity, on the part of the executive or advisory board members, or any officer, or employee of the executive or advisory board, for or on account of any act performed or obligation entered into in an official capacity when done in good faith, without intent to defraud, and in connection with the administration, management, or conduct of this chapter or affairs related to this chapter.

History

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 13, 59 DCR 213